North Carolina, session 2025, SB1012.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Part 2 of Article 14A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-218.92. Nonprofit management organizations.
A charter school shall not be managed by or obtain services from for-profit education
management organizations or charter management organizations. Charter schools may be
managed by or obtain services from nonprofit education management organizations or charter
management organizations."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-218.122(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) A remote charter academy may shall require students to attend in person to fulfill
State-mandated student assessments.assessments in accordance with G.S. 115C-174.17.
(c1) A remote charter academy may conduct optional in-person meetings between students
and instructors or parents and instructors at a charter school facility."
SECTION 1.(c) Part 2 of Article 10A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-174.17. In-person testing for remote charter students.
The Department of Public Instruction shall develop an in-person testing program to enable
all students that attend a fully remote charter school to complete all State-mandated assessments
in person. As part of the assessment program for remote charter students, the Department shall:
(1) Establish at least 10 regional testing centers, spread across the State to ensure
all students can report for assessments with minimal travel burdens.
(2) Contract for personnel to administer and proctor the assessments. Contract
administrators and proctors may be other public school unit employees but
shall not be employees of the remote charter school that the students being
assessed attend.
*S1012-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Hire or contract for a minimum of one social worker to be present at every
assessment. Students shall be informed of the availability of social workers at
the assessments."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-218.123(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The Review Board shall review and approve a charter or charter modification for the
creation of a remote charter academy that meets the requirements established in this Part for a
term of five years. one year. The Review Board shall approve a minimum of two statewide remote
charter academies that meet the qualifications of this Part for operation beginning with the
2026-2027 school year and thereafter."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-218.124 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.124. Operation and renewal of remote charter academies.
…
(b) Each approved remote charter academy shall receive a school code. A nonprofit that
has a school code for in-person instruction in addition to a school code for a remote charter
academy may provide all financial reporting for both school codes jointly in a form directed by
the Department of Public Instruction.shall provide separate financial reports for each school
code. As a condition of renewal, a remote charter academy shall submit with its renewal
application a financial audit for the previous year.
(c) A nonprofit may apply for renewal of the remote charter academy for additional terms
of five years. one year. The Review Board shall consider compliance with the requirements of
this Part and success of the remote charter academy in the prior five years in determining whether
to approve a request for renewal of a remote charter academy.
(d) A remote charter academy that is identified as low-performing is not eligible for
charter renewal."
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds
beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the Department to hire one or more
High-Performing Placement Coaches. The purpose of the High-Performing Placement Coaches
shall be to counsel and guide families through school transition when a student is attending a
remote charter academy that is not renewed as a result of being low-performing.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of sixty-two thousand dollars ($62,000) in recurring funds beginning
with the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the Department to establish the in-person assessment program
as required under G.S. 15C-174.17, as enacted by this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026. Section 1(a) of this act applies
to contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2026. Sections 1(b) through (e) of this act apply to
applications for new charters or renewals submitted on or after July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1012-First Edition